California statutes. Corporations Code
(5) Identification and discussion of any material operating and capital expenditures incurred by the social purpose corporation during the fiscal year in furtherance of achieving the special purpose objectives, a good faith estimate of any additional material operating or capital expenditures the social purpose corporation expects to incur over the next three fiscal years in order to achieve its special purpose objectives, and other material expenditures of resources incurred by
 the social purpose corporation during the fiscal year, including employee time, in furtherance of achieving the special purpose objectives, including a discussion of the extent to which that capital or use of other resources serves purposes other than and in addition to furthering the achievement of the special purpose objectives.

(c) Except as may otherwise be excused pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1501.5, the reports specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be sent to the shareholders at least 15 days, or, if sent by bulk mail, 35 days, prior to the annual meeting of shareholders to be held during the next fiscal year. This requirement shall not limit the requirement for holding an annual meeting as required by Section 600.

(d) If no annual report for the last fiscal year has been sent to shareholders, the social purpose corporation shall, upon the written request of
 any shareholder made more than 120 days after the end of that fiscal year, deliver or mail to the person making the request within 30 days following the request, the statements required by subdivisions (a) and (b) for that fiscal year.

(e) A shareholder or shareholders holding at least 5 percent of the outstanding shares of any class of a social purpose corporation may make a written request to the social purpose corporation for an income statement of the social purpose corporation for the three-month, six-month, or nine-month period of the current fiscal year ended more than 30 days prior to the date of the request and a balance sheet of the social purpose corporation as at the end of that period and, in addition, if no annual report for the most recent fiscal year has been sent to the shareholders, the statements referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) relating to that fiscal year. The statements shall be delivered or mailed to the person
 making the request within 30 days following the request. A copy of the statements shall be kept on file in the principal office of the social purpose corporation for 12 months and shall be exhibited at all reasonable times to any shareholder demanding an examination of the statements or a copy shall be mailed to the shareholder. The quarterly income statements and balance sheets referred to in this subdivision shall be accompanied by the report thereon, if any, of any independent accountants engaged by the social purpose corporation or the certificate of an authorized officer of the social purpose corporation that the financial statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the social purpose corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 64.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3501.

(a) The board shall cause a special purpose current report to be sent to the shareholders not later than 45 days following the occurrence of any one or more of the events specified in subdivision (b) or (c), and, to the extent consistent with reasonable confidentiality requirements, shall cause the special purpose current report to be made publicly available by posting it on the social purpose corporation’s Internet Web site or providing it through similar electronic means.

(b) Unless previously reported in the most recent annual report, the special purpose current report shall identify and discuss, in reasonable detail, any expenditure or group of related or planned expenditures, excluding compensation of officers and
 directors, made in furtherance of the special purpose objectives, whether an operating expenditure, a capital expenditure, or some other expenditure of corporate resources, including, but not limited to, employee time, whether the expenditure was direct or indirect, and whether the expenditure was categorized as overhead or otherwise where the expenditure has or is likely to have a material adverse impact on the social purpose corporation’s results of operations or financial condition for a quarterly or annual fiscal period.

(c) Unless previously reported in the most recent annual report, the special purpose current report shall identify and discuss, in reasonable detail, any decision by the board or action by management to do either of the following:

(1) Withhold expenditures or a group of related or planned expenditures, whether temporarily or permanently, that were to have been
 made in furtherance of the special purpose as contemplated in the most recent annual report, whether those planned expenditures were an operating expenditure, a capital expenditure, or some other expenditure of corporate resources, including, but not limited to, employee time, whether the planned expenditure was direct or indirect, and whether the planned expenditure to be made would have been categorized as overhead or otherwise, in any case, where the planned expenditure was likely to have had a material positive impact on the social purpose corporation’s impact in furtherance of its special purpose objectives, as contemplated in the most recent annual report.

(2) Determine that the special purpose has been satisfied or should no longer be pursued, whether temporarily or permanently.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 65.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3502.

(a) Nothing contained in subdivision (b) of Section 3500 or Section 3501 shall require a detailing or itemization of every relevant expenditure incurred, or planned or action taken or planned, by the corporation. Management and the board shall use their discretion in providing that information, including the reasonable detail that a reasonable investor would consider important in understanding the corporation’s objectives, actions, impacts, measures, rationale, and results of operations as they relate to the nature and achievement of the special purpose objectives.

(b) Where best practices emerge for providing the information required by subdivision (b) of Section 3500 or Section
 3501, use of those best practices shall create a presumption that the social purpose corporation caused all the information required by those provisions to be provided. This presumption can only be rebutted by showing that the reporting contained either a misstatement of a material fact or omission of a material fact.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 3500 and Section 3501, under no circumstances shall the social purpose corporation be required to provide information that would result in a violation of state or federal securities laws or other applicable laws.

(d) The social purpose corporation and its officers and directors are expressly excluded from liability for any and all forward looking statements supplied in the report required by subdivision (b) of Section
 3500 and Section 3501, so long as those statements are supplied in good faith. Statements are deemed to be forward looking as that term is defined in the federal securities laws.

(e) The special purpose MD&A and any special purpose current report shall be written in plain English and shall be provided in an efficient and understandable manner, avoiding repetition and disclosure of immaterial information.

(f) Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws, and if approved by the board of directors, the reports specified in Sections 3500 and 3501 and any accompanying material sent pursuant to this section may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation.

(g) The financial statements of any social purpose
 corporation with fewer than 100 holders of record of its shares, determined as provided in Section 605, required to be furnished by Sections 3500 and 3501 are not required to be prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles if they reasonably set forth the assets and liabilities and the income and expense of the social purpose corporation and disclose the accounting basis used in their preparation.

(h) The requirements described in Section 3500 shall be satisfied if a corporation with an outstanding class of securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 both complies with Section 240.14a-16 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended from time to time, with respect to the obligation of a corporation to furnish an annual report to shareholders pursuant to Section
 240.14a-3(b) of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and includes the information required by subdivision (b) of Section 3500 in the annual report.

(i) The requirements described in Section 3501 shall be satisfied if a corporation with an outstanding class of securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 both complies with Section 240.13a-13 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended from time to time, with respect to the obligation of a corporation to furnish a quarterly report to shareholders, and includes the information required by subdivision (b) of Section 3501 in the quarterly report.

(j) In addition to the penalties provided for in this division, the superior court of the proper county shall enforce the duty of making and
 mailing or delivering the information and financial statements required by Sections 3500 and 3501 and, for good cause shown, may extend the time therefor.

(k) In any action or proceeding with respect to Section 3500 or 3501, if the court finds the failure of the social purpose corporation to comply with the requirements of those sections to have been without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to
 reimburse the shareholder for the reasonable expenses incurred by the shareholder, including attorney’s fees, in connection with the action or proceeding.

(l) Section 3500 and Section 3501 apply to any domestic social purpose corporation and also to a foreign social purpose corporation having its principal office in California or customarily holding meetings of its board in this state.

(m) All reports and notices required by Section 3500 and Section 3501 shall be maintained by the social purpose corporation, in an electronic form for a period of not less than 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 42.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3503.

Any officers, directors, employees, or agents of a social purpose corporation who do any of the following shall be liable jointly and severally for all the damages resulting therefrom to the social purpose corporation or any person injured by those actions who relied on those actions or to both:

(a) Make, issue, deliver, or publish any prospectus, report, including the reports required pursuant to Sections 3500 and 3501, circular, certificate, financial statement, balance sheet, public notice, or document respecting the social purpose corporation or its shares, assets, liabilities, capital, dividends, business, earnings, or accounts which is false in any material respect, knowing it to be false, or participate in the making, issuance, delivery,
 or publication thereof with knowledge that the same is false in a material respect.

(b) Make or cause to be made in the books, minutes, records, or accounts of a social purpose corporation any entry that is false in any material particular knowing it to be false.

(c) Remove, erase, alter, or cancel any entry in any books or records of the social purpose corporation, with intent to deceive.

(d) With respect to the reports required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3500 and Section 3501, omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements contained therein, in light of the circumstances under which those statements were made, not misleading in a material respect, knowing the omission to be misleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 67.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 2. NONPROFIT CORPORATION LAW [5000. - 10841.]

5000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Nonprofit Corporation Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

This division of the Nonprofit Corporation Law, or any part, chapter, article or section thereof, may at any time be amended or repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS GOVERNING PARTS 1 THROUGH 5 [5002. - 5080.]

5002.

Unless the provisions or the context otherwise requires, the general provisions and definitions set forth in this part govern the construction of this part and of Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 9910) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

(a) The provisions of this part apply to:

(1) Corporations organized under Part 2, Part 3, and Part 4 of this division; 

(2) Corporations expressly subject to Part 2, Part 3 or Part 4 of this division pursuant to a particular provision of this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or other specific statutory provision;

(3) Corporations which pursuant to the express provisions of Part 1, Division 2 (commencing with Section 9000) in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1980, are subject to the provisions of Part 1 of Division 2 and which, on or after January 1, 1980, are subject to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law or the Nonprofit Religious Corporation Law, pursuant to Section 9912.

(4) Corporations expressly subject to Part 1, Division 2 (commencing with Section 9000) in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1980, pursuant to a particular provision of this division or Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or other specific statutory provision in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1980, and which, on or after January 1, 1980, are subject to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, or the Nonprofit Religious Corporation Law, pursuant to Section 9912; and

(5) Corporations incorporated as permitted by subdivision (d) of Section 9911.

(b) The existence of corporations formed or existing on the date of enactment or reenactment of this part, Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5 shall not be affected by the enactment or reenactment of such parts or by any change in the requirements for the formation of corporations or by the amendment or repeal of the laws under which they were formed or created.

(c) Neither the repeals effected by the enactment or reenactment of this part or of Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5, nor the amendment thereof shall impair or take away any existing liability or cause of action against any corporation, its members, directors or officers incurred prior to the time of such enactment, reenactment or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

A corporation may be sued as provided in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

Any corporation shall, as a condition of its existence as a corporation, be subject to the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure authorizing the attachment of corporate property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.1.

(a) Except for a liability that may be insured against pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code, an authorized corporation may do any of the following:

(1) Insure itself against all or any part of any tort liability.

(2) Insure any employee of the corporation against all or any part of his or her liability for injury resulting from an act or omission in the scope of employment.

(3) Insure any board member, officer, or volunteer of the corporation against any liability that may arise from any act or omission
 in the scope of participation with the corporation.

(4) Insure itself against any loss arising from physical damage to motor vehicles owned or operated by the corporation.

(5) Insure itself against the loss or damage to property of every kind, including, but not limited to, losses and expenses related to the loss of property.

(b) (1) The arrangement authorized pursuant to this section shall only be available to an authorized corporation where that corporation has joined with two or more other authorized corporations
 to provide for the pooling of self-insured claims or losses. The pooling arrangement shall be organized as a nonprofit public benefit corporation pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) and shall not be considered insurance nor be subject to regulation under the Insurance Code.

(2) A pooling arrangement shall include in every application form for membership and every risk pooling contract issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2016, and in boldface 10-point type on the front page, the following notice:
“Notice: This risk pooling contract is issued by a pooling arrangement authorized by California Corporations Code Section 5005.1. The pooling arrangement is not subject to all of the insurance laws of the State of California and is not subject to regulation by the Insurance Commissioner. Insurance guaranty funds are not available to pay claims in the event the risk pool becomes insolvent.”
(c) This section does not authorize a
 corporation organized pursuant to this division to pay for, or to insure, contract, or provide for payment for, any part of a claim or judgment against an employee of the corporation for punitive or exemplary damages.

(d) (1) Any insurance pool established pursuant to this section shall have initial pooled resources of not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(2) Any insurance pool providing the coverage described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(A) Be organized for the purpose of providing the coverage described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) for a period of no less than five years.

(B) Have accumulated net assets of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(e) All participating corporations in any pool established pursuant to this section are required to agree to pay premiums or make other mandatory financial contributions or commitments necessary to ensure a financially sound risk pool.

(f) For the purpose of this section, an authorized “corporation” means any corporation that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Is organized chiefly to
 provide or fund health or human services, but does not include a hospital.

(2) Is exempt from federal income taxation as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   (SB 1011)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

The fees of the Secretary of State for filing instruments by or on behalf of corporations are prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 12180) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

Any agreement, certificate or other instrument relating to a domestic corporation, a foreign corporation, or a foreign business corporation filed pursuant to the provisions of this part, Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5 may be corrected with respect to any misstatement of fact contained therein, any defect in the execution thereof or any other error or defect contained therein, by filing a certificate of correction entitled “Certificate of Correction of _____ (insert here the title of the agreement, certificate or other instrument to be corrected and name(s) of the corporation or corporations)”; provided, however, that no such certificate of correction shall alter the wording of any resolution which was in fact adopted by the board or the members or delegates or effect a corrected amendment of articles which amendment as so corrected would not in all respects have complied with the requirements of this part, Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5 at the time of filing of the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected. Such certificate of correction shall be signed and verified or acknowledged as provided in this part with respect to the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected. It shall set forth the following:

(a) The name or names of the corporation or corporations.

(b) The date the agreement, certificate or other instrument being corrected was filed.

(c) The provision in the agreement, certificate or other instrument as corrected and, if the execution was defective, wherein it was defective.

The filing of the certificate of correction shall not alter the effective time of the agreement, certificate or instrument being corrected, which shall remain as its original effective time, and such filing shall not affect any right or liability accrued or incurred before such filing, except that any right or liability accrued or incurred by reason of the error or defect being corrected shall be extinguished by such filing if the person having such right has not detrimentally relied on the original instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

(a) Upon receipt of any instrument by the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to this part, Part 2, Part 3, Part 4, or Part 5, if it conforms to law, it shall be filed by, and in the office of the Secretary of State and the date of filing endorsed thereon. Except for instruments filed pursuant to Section 6210, 8210, or 9660 the date of filing shall be the date the instrument is received by the Secretary of State unless the instrument provides that it is to be withheld from filing until a future date, other than instruments filed pursuant to Section 5017, or, unless in the judgment of the Secretary of State, the filing is intended to be coordinated with the filing of some other corporate document which cannot be filed. The Secretary of State
 shall file a document as of any requested future date not more than 90 days after its receipt, including a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, if the document is received in the Secretary of State’s office at least one business day prior to the requested date of filing. An instrument does not fail to conform to law because it is not accompanied by the full filing fee if the unpaid portion of the fee does not exceed the limits established by the policy of the Secretary of State for extending credit in these cases.

(b) If the Secretary of State determines that an instrument submitted for filing or otherwise submitted does not conform to law and returns it to the person submitting it, the instrument may be resubmitted accompanied by a written opinion of the member of the State Bar of California submitting the instrument, or representing
 the person submitting it, to the effect that the specific provision of the instrument objected to by the Secretary of State does conform to law and stating the points and authorities upon which the opinion is based. The Secretary of State shall rely, with respect to any disputed point of law, other than the application of Section 5122, 7122, or 9122, upon that written opinion in determining whether the instrument conforms to law. The date of filing in that case shall be the date the instrument is received on resubmission.

(c) Any instrument filed with respect to a corporation, other than original articles or instruments filed pursuant to Section 5017, may provide that it is to become effective not more than 90 days subsequent to its filing date. In case such a delayed effective date is specified, the instrument may be prevented from becoming effective
 by a certificate stating that by appropriate corporate action it has been revoked and is null and void, executed in the same manner as the original instrument and filed before the specified effective date. In the case of a merger agreement, the certificate revoking the earlier filing need only be executed on behalf of one of the constituent corporations. If no revocation certificate is filed, the instrument becomes effective on the date specified.

(d) Any instrument submitted to the Secretary of State for filing pursuant to this part, Part 2, Part 3, Part 4, or Part 5 by a domestic corporation or foreign corporation that is qualified to transact business in California under Section 2105 shall include the entity name and number as they exist on the Secretary of State’s records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 29.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.5.

The Secretary of State may cancel the filing of articles if a check or other remittance accepted in payment of the filing fee or franchise tax is not paid upon presentation. Within 90 days of receiving written notification that the item presented for payment has not been honored for payment, the Secretary of State shall give written notice of the applicability of this section and the cancellation date, which shall be not less than 20 days from the date of mailing the written notice as certified by the Secretary of State, to the agent for service of process or to the person submitting the instrument. Thereafter, if the amount has not been paid by cashier’s check or equivalent before the date of cancellation as stated in the
 written notice of cancellation, the cancellation shall thereupon be effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 43.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.6.

(a) A corporation that (1) fails to file a statement pursuant to Section 6210, 8210, or 9660 for an applicable filing period, (2) has not filed a statement pursuant to Section 6210, 8210, or 9660 during the preceding 24 months, and (3) was certified for penalty pursuant to Section 6810, 8810, or 9690 for the same filing period, shall be subject to suspension pursuant to this section rather than to penalty under Section 6810 or 8810.

(b) When subdivision (a) is applicable, the Secretary of State shall provide a notice to the corporation informing the corporation that its corporate powers, rights, and privileges will be suspended 60 days from the
 date of the notice if the corporation does not file the statement required by Section 6210, 8210, or 9660.

(c) If the 60-day period expires without the delinquent corporation filing the required statement, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the suspension, and provide a notice of the suspension to the corporation. Thereupon, except for the purpose of filing an application for exempt status or amending the articles of incorporation as necessary either to perfect that application or to set forth a new name, the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of the corporation are suspended.

(d) A statement required by Section 6210, 8210, or 9660 may be filed, notwithstanding suspension of the corporate powers, rights, and privileges under this section or under
 provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon the filing of a statement under Section 6210, 8210, or 9660, by a corporation that has suffered suspension under this section, the Secretary of State shall certify that fact to the Franchise Tax Board and the corporation may thereupon be relieved from suspension, unless the corporation is held in suspension by the Franchise Tax Board because of Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 12.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.9.

(a) A nonprofit corporation described in Section 5059, 5060, or 5061, or a foreign nonprofit corporation, as defined in Section 5053, that has qualified to transact intrastate business, shall be subject to administrative dissolution or administrative surrender in accordance with this section if, as of January 1, 2016, or later, the nonprofit corporation’s or foreign corporation’s corporate powers are, and have been, suspended or forfeited by the Franchise Tax Board for a period of not less than 48 continuous months.

(b) Prior to the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender of the nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation, the corporation shall be notified of
 the pending administrative dissolution or administrative surrender as follows:

(1) The Franchise Tax Board shall mail written notice to the last known address of a nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation meeting the requirement described in subdivision (a).

(2) If the nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation does not have a valid address in the records of the Franchise Tax Board, the notice provided in subdivision (d) shall be deemed sufficient notice prior to administrative dissolution or administrative surrender.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall transmit to the Secretary of State and the Attorney General’s Registry of Charities and Fundraisers the names and Secretary of State file numbers of nonprofit
 corporations and foreign corporations subject to the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender provisions of this section.

(d) The Secretary of State shall provide 60 calendar days’ notice of the pending administrative dissolution or administrative surrender on its internet website by listing the corporation name and the Secretary of State’s file number for the nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation. The Secretary of State shall also, in conjunction with the information above, provide instructions for a nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation to submit a written objection of the pending administrative dissolution or administrative surrender to the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) (1) A nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation may provide
 the Franchise Tax Board with a written objection to the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Secretary of State if a written objection has been received.

(f) If no written objection to the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender is received by the Franchise Tax Board during the 60-day period described in subdivision (d), the nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation shall be administratively dissolved or administratively surrendered in accordance with this section. The certificate of the Secretary of State shall be prima facie evidence of the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender.

(g) (1) If the
 written objection of a nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation to the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender has been received by the Franchise Tax Board before the expiration of the 60-day period described in subdivision (d), that nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation shall have an additional 90 days from the date the written objection is received by the Franchise Tax Board to pay or otherwise satisfy all accrued taxes, penalties, and interest and to file a current Statement of Information with the Secretary of State.

(2) (A) If the conditions in paragraph (1) are satisfied, the administrative dissolution or administrative surrender shall be canceled.

(B) If the conditions in paragraph (1) are not satisfied, the nonprofit corporation or
 foreign corporation shall be administratively dissolved or administratively surrendered in accordance with this section as of the date that is 90 days after the receipt of the written objection.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may extend the 90-day period in paragraph (1), but for no more than one period of 90 days.

(h) Upon administrative dissolution or administrative surrender in accordance with this section, the nonprofit corporation’s or the foreign corporation’s liabilities for qualified taxes, interest, and penalties as defined in Section 23156 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if any, shall be abated. Any actions taken by the Franchise Tax Board to collect that abated liability shall be released, withdrawn, or otherwise terminated by the Franchise Tax Board, and no subsequent
 administrative or civil action shall be taken or brought to collect all or part of that amount. Any amounts erroneously received by the Franchise Tax Board in contravention of this section may be credited and refunded in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 19301) of Chapter 6 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(i) If the nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation is administratively dissolved or administratively surrendered under this section, the liability to creditors, if any, is not discharged. The liability of the directors of, or other persons related to, the administratively dissolved or administratively surrendered nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation is not discharged. The administrative dissolution or administrative surrender of a nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation pursuant
 to this section shall not diminish or adversely affect the ability of the Attorney General to enforce liabilities as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 18.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

Except as otherwise required, any reference in this part, Part 2, Part 3, Part 4 or Part 5 to mailing means first-, second-, or third-class mail, postage prepaid, unless registered mail is specified. Registered mail includes certified mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

If the articles or bylaws provide for more or less than one vote for any membership on any matter, the references in Sections 5033 and 5034 to a majority or other proportion of memberships mean, as to those matters, a majority or other proportion of the votes entitled to be cast. Whenever in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) members are disqualified from voting on any matter, their memberships shall not be counted for the determination of a quorum at any meeting to act upon, or the required vote to approve action upon, that matter under any other provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) or the articles or bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

All references in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) to the voting of memberships include the voting of securities given voting rights in the articles pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7132.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

All references in this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), or Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) to financial statements of a corporation mean statements prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles or some other basis of accounting which reasonably sets forth the assets and liabilities and the income and expenses of the corporation and discloses the accounting basis used in their preparation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5013.

As used in this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), or Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110), “independent accountant” means a certified public accountant or public accountant who is independent of the corporation, as determined in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, and who is engaged to audit financial statements of the corporation or perform other accounting services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

5014.

Any requirement in Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) for a vote of each class of members means such a vote regardless of limitations or restrictions upon the voting rights thereof, unless expressly limited to voting memberships.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.

Any reference in this part, Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110), Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110), or Part 5 (commencing with Section 9910) to the time a notice is given or sent means, unless otherwise expressly provided, (a) the time a written notice by mail is deposited in the United States mails, postage prepaid; or (b) the time any other written notice, including facsimile, telegram, or other electronic mail message, is personally delivered to the recipient or is delivered to a common carrier for transmission, or actually transmitted by the person giving the notice by electronic means, to the recipient; or (c) the time any oral notice is communicated, in person or by telephone, including a voice messaging system or other system or technology designed to record and communicate messages, or wireless, to the recipient, including the recipient’s designated voice mailbox or address on such a system, or to a person at the office of the recipient who the person giving the notice has reason to believe will promptly communicate it to the recipient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 154, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5016.

A notice or report mailed or delivered as part of a newsletter, magazine or other organ regularly sent to members shall constitute written notice or report pursuant to this division when addressed and mailed or delivered to the member, or in the case of members who are residents of the same household and who have the same address on the books of the corporation, when addressed and mailed or delivered to one of such members, at the address appearing on the books of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

5017.

(a) (1) Otherwise lawful corporate actions not in compliance, or purportedly not in compliance, with this division or the articles, bylaws, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time of the corporate action, may be ratified, or validated by the superior court, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(2) Except as otherwise determined by the superior court pursuant to subdivision (e), a ratification or validation of a corporate action in accordance with this section is conclusive in the absence of fraud.

(3) This section does not limit the authority of the board, the members, or the corporation to effect any other
 lawful means of ratification or validation of a corporate action or correction of a record.

(4) No corporate action may be ratified under subdivision (b) by a dissolved corporation or a foreign corporation, and no petition may be filed under subdivision (e) in respect of any corporate action of such a corporation.

(5) This section shall not be used to ratify or validate any corporate action in respect of any of the following:
